Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-801.01
Terms, defined.

As used in sections 77-801 to 77-804:

(1) Nonoperating property means property owned or leased by a public service entity that does not contribute to the entity's function;

(2) Operating property means property owned or leased that contributes to a public service entity's function; and

(3) Public service entity means any person as defined in section 49-801 or entity, organized for profit under the laws of this state or any other state or government and engaged in the business of waterworks, electrical power, gas works, natural gas, telecommunications, pipelines used for the transmission of oil, heat, steam, or any substance to be used for lighting, heating, or power, and pipelines used for the transmission of articles by pneumatic or other power and all other similar or like entities.

Laws 1985, LB 269, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 732, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 38;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 39;

Laws 2006, LB 808, § 26.